District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.63

Certification of veterinary technicians; restrictions.

(a)

A person shall not engage in activities related to maintaining the health or treatment of an animal unless certified by the Board of Veterinary Medicine as a veterinary technician.

(b)

A person certified as a veterinary technician may provide only veterinary technician services, as prescribed by the Mayor through rulemaking, and only under the general supervision of a veterinarian licensed in the District.

(c)

A person certified as a veterinary technician shall not receive compensation for performing veterinary technician services, except that a certified veterinary technician may receive a salary or other compensation paid by an employing veterinarian, veterinary facility, shelter, humane society, animal control facility, or wildlife rehabilitation facility.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 863
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(q), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.